Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6067HV (1) 91 da/js H.F. 2530 Section 1. Section 455B.195, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0g. The department shall not place any 3 water of the state on a section 303(d) list based on levels 4 of fecal indicator bacteria until the department conducts an 5 analysis, which may include using microbial source tracking, to 6 designate by percentage each species of animal, if any, that 7 has contributed to the impairment. 8